Washington statutes.
RCW 15.65.500

Bonds of administrator, board, employee.

The director or his or her designee shall require that a bond be given by every administrator, administrative board, and/or employee occupying a position of trust under any marketing agreement or order, in such amount as the director or his or her designee shall deem necessary, the premium for which bond or bonds shall be paid from assessments collected pursuant to such order or agreement: PROVIDED, That such bond need not be given with respect to any person covered by any blanket bond covering officials or employees of the state of Washington.

[ 2010 c 8 s 6087; 1961 c 256 s 50.]